Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6193.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.41.040 and 2025 c 122 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree:(i) If the person owns, accesses, has in the person's custody, control, or possession, or receives any firearm after having previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense; or(ii) If the person owns, accesses, has in the person's custody, control, or possession, or receives any untraceable or undetectable firearm during any period of time that the person is subject to an order described in subsection (2)(a)(ii) of this section.(b) A juvenile is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree if the juvenile owns, accesses, has in the juvenile's custody, control, or possession, or receives any firearm after having previously been adjudicated, convicted, or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state of subsection (2)(a)(v) of this section or a comparable out-of-state offense.(c) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(2)(a) A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the person does not qualify under subsection (1) of this section for the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree and the person owns, accesses, has in the person's custody, control, or possession, or receives any firearm:(i) After having previously been convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity in this state or elsewhere of:(A) Any felony not specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under subsection (1) of this section;(B) Any of the following crimes when committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, as those terms are defined by the statutes in effect at the time of the commission of the crime, committed on or after July 1, 1993: Assault in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking, reckless endangerment, criminal trespass in the first degree, or violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence (RCW 10.99.040 or any of the former RCW 26.50.060, 26.50.070, and 26.50.130);(C) Harassment when committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, as those terms are defined by the statutes in effect at the time of the commission of the crime, committed on or after June 7, 2018;(D) Any of the following misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor crimes not included under (a)(i) (B) or (C) of this subsection, committed on or after July 23, 2023: Domestic violence (RCW 10.99.020); stalking; cyberstalking; cyber harassment, excluding cyber harassment committed solely pursuant to the element set forth in RCW 9A.90.120(1)(a)(i); harassment; aiming or discharging a firearm (RCW 9.41.230); unlawful carrying or handling of a firearm (RCW 9.41.270); animal cruelty in the second degree committed under RCW 16.52.207(1); or any prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055(14) if committed within seven years of a conviction for any other prior offense under RCW 46.61.5055;(E) A violation of the provisions of a protection order under chapter 7.105 RCW restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence, when committed by one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another, committed on or after July 1, 2022; or(F) A violation of the provisions of an order to surrender and prohibit weapons, an extreme risk protection order, or the provisions of any other protection order or no-contact order not included under (a)(i) (B) or (E) of this subsection restraining the person or excluding the person from a residence, committed on or after July 23, 2023;(ii) During any period of time that the person is subject to a protection order, no-contact order, or restraining order by a court issued under chapter 7.105, 9A.40, 9A.44, 9A.46, 9A.88, 10.99, 26.09, 26.26A, or 26.26B RCW or any of the former chapters 7.90, 7.92, 10.14, and 26.50 RCW that:(A) Was issued after a hearing for which the person received actual notice, and at which the person had an opportunity to participate, whether the court then issues a full order or reissues a temporary order. If the court enters an agreed order by the parties without a hearing, such an order meets the requirements of this subsection;(B) Restrains the person from harassing, stalking, or threatening the person protected under the order or child of the person or protected person, or others identified in the order, or engaging in other conduct that would place the protected person in reasonable fear of bodily injury to the protected person or child or others identified in the order; and(C)(I) Includes a finding that the person represents a credible threat to the physical safety of the protected person or child or others identified in the order, or by its terms explicitly prohibits the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the protected person or child or other persons that would reasonably be expected to cause bodily injury; or(II) Includes an order under RCW 9.41.800 requiring the person to surrender all firearms and prohibiting the person from accessing, having in his or her custody or control, possessing, purchasing, receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, firearms;(iii) After having previously been involuntarily committed based on a mental disorder under RCW 71.05.240, 71.05.320, 71.34.740, 71.34.750, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction, unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW 9.41.047;(iv) After dismissal of criminal charges based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.645, or after dismissal of criminal charges based on incompetency to stand trial under RCW 10.77.650 when the court has made a finding indicating that the defendant has a history of one or more violent acts, unless his or her right to possess a firearm has been restored as provided in RCW 9.41.047;(v) If the person is under 18 years of age, except as provided in RCW 9.41.042; and/or(vi) If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial for a serious offense as defined in RCW 9.41.010.(b) Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a class C felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.(3) A person shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or the conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence. Where no record of the court's disposition of the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person was not convicted of the charge.(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) or (2) of this section, a person convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity of an offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section other than murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault, kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to controlled substances under RCW 69.50.401 and 69.50.410, who received a probationary sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a dismissal of the charge under RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a result of the conviction or finding of not guilty by reason of insanity.(5) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a person under the age of 18 years is found by a court to have possessed a firearm in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or to have committed an offense while armed with a firearm during which offense a motor vehicle served an integral function, the court shall notify the department of licensing within 24 hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be revoked under RCW 46.20.265, unless the offense is the juvenile's first offense in violation of this section and has not committed an offense while armed with a firearm, an unlawful possession of a firearm offense, or an offense in violation of chapter 66.44, 69.52, 69.41, or 69.50 RCW.(6) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged and subsequently convicted for the separate felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, in addition to being charged and subsequently convicted under this section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree. Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive sentences for each of the felony crimes of conviction listed in this subsection.(7)(a) A person, whether an adult or a juvenile, commits the civil infraction of unlawful possession of a firearm if the person has in the person's possession or has in the person's control a firearm after the person files a voluntary waiver of firearm rights under RCW 9.41.350 and the form has been accepted by the clerk of the court and the voluntary waiver has not been lawfully revoked.(b) The civil infraction of unlawful possession of a firearm is a class 4 civil infraction punishable according to chapter 7.80 RCW.(c) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this subsection (7) shall be a separate infraction.(d) The court may, in its discretion, order performance of up to two hours of community restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty prescribed for a civil infraction under this subsection (7).(8) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be a separate offense.(9) A person may petition to restore the right to possess a firearm as provided in RCW 9.41.041.Sec. 2. RCW 13.40.0357 and 2023 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORYjuveniledispositionoffensecategorydescription (rcw citation)juvenile dispositioncategory forattempt, bailjump,conspiracy, orsolicitationÂ Arson and Malicious MischiefÂ AArson 1 (9A.48.020)B+Â BArson 2 (9A.48.030)CÂ CReckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040)DÂ DReckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050)EÂ BMalicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070)CÂ CMalicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080)DÂ DMalicious Mischief 3 (9A.48.090)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus (9.40.100)EÂ ETampering with Fire Alarm Apparatus with Intent to Commit Arson (9.40.105)EÂ APossession of Incendiary Device (9.40.120)B+Â Â Assault and Other Crimes Involving Physical HarmÂ Â AAssault 1 (9A.36.011)B+Â B+Assault 2 (9A.36.021)C+Â C+Assault 3 (9A.36.031)D+Â D+Assault 4 (9A.36.041)EÂ B+Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 15 or underC+Â A++Drive-By Shooting (9A.36.045) committed at age 16 or 17AÂ D+Reckless Endangerment (9A.36.050)EÂ C+Promoting Suicide Attempt (9A.36.060)D+Â D+Coercion (9A.36.070)EÂ C+Custodial Assault (9A.36.100)D+Â Â Burglary and TrespassÂ Â B+Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 15 or underC+Â A-Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) committed atage 16 or 17B+Â BResidential Burglary (9A.52.025)CÂ BBurglary 2 (9A.52.030)CÂ DBurglary Tools (Possession of) (9A.52.060)EÂ DCriminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070)EÂ ECriminal Trespass 2 (9A.52.080)EÂ CMineral Trespass (78.44.330)CÂ CVehicle Prowling 1 (9A.52.095)DÂ DVehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100)EÂ Â DrugsÂ Â EPossession/Consumption of Alcohol (66.44.270)EÂ CIllegally Obtaining Legend Drug (69.41.020)DÂ C+Sale, Delivery, Possession of Legend Drug with Intent to Sell (69.41.030(2)(a))D+Â EPossession of LegendDrug (69.41.030(2)(b))EÂ B+Violation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Sale (69.50.401(2) (a) or (b))B+Â CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Sale (69.50.401(2)(c))CÂ EPossession of Cannabis <40 grams (69.50.4014)EÂ CFraudulently Obtaining Controlled Substance (69.50.403)CÂ C+Sale of Controlled Substance for Profit (69.50.410)C+Â EUnlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020)EÂ BViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Narcotic, Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (a) or (b))BÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Nonnarcotic Counterfeit Substances (69.50.4011(2) (c), (d), or (e))CÂ EViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4013)EÂ CViolation of Uniform Controlled Substances Act - Possession of a Controlled Substance (69.50.4012)CÂ Â Firearms and WeaponsÂ Â BTheft of Firearm (9A.56.300)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Firearm(9A.56.310)CÂ ECarrying Loaded Pistol Without Permit (9.41.050)EÂ CPossession of Firearms by Minor (<18) (9.41.040(2)(a) (v))CÂ B+Possession of Firearms by Minor (with prior) (9.41.040(1)(b))C+Â D+Possession of Dangerous Weapon (9.41.250)EÂ DIntimidating Another Person by use of Weapon (9.41.270)EÂ Â HomicideÂ Â A+Murder 1 (9A.32.030)AÂ A+Murder 2 (9A.32.050)B+Â B+Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060)C+Â C+Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070)D+Â B+Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520)C+Â Â KidnappingÂ Â AKidnap 1 (9A.40.020)B+Â B+Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030)C+Â C+Unlawful Imprisonment (9A.40.040)D+Â Â Obstructing Governmental OperationÂ Â DObstructing a Law Enforcement Officer (9A.76.020)EÂ EResisting Arrest (9A.76.040)EÂ BIntroducing Contraband 1 (9A.76.140)CÂ CIntroducing Contraband 2 (9A.76.150)DÂ EIntroducing Contraband 3 (9A.76.160)EÂ B+Intimidating a Public Servant (9A.76.180)C+Â B+Intimidating a Witness (9A.72.110)C+Â Â Public DisturbanceÂ Â C+Criminal Mischief with Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(b))D+Â D+Criminal Mischief Without Weapon (9A.84.010(2)(a))EÂ EFailure to Disperse (9A.84.020)EÂ EDisorderly Conduct (9A.84.030)EÂ Â Sex CrimesÂ Â ARape 1 (9A.44.040)B+Â B++Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Rape 2 (9A.44.050) committed at age 15 through age 17B+Â C+Rape 3 (9A.44.060)D+Â B++Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073)committed at age 15B+Â B+Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076)C+Â BIncest 1 (9A.64.020(1))CÂ CIncest 2 (9A.64.020(2))DÂ D+Indecent Exposure (Victim <14) (9A.88.010)EÂ EIndecent Exposure (Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010)EÂ B+Promoting Prostitution 1 (9A.88.070)C+Â C+Promoting Prostitution 2 (9A.88.080)D+Â EO & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030)EÂ B+Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100)C+Â B++Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 14 or underB+Â A-Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) committed at age 15 through age 17B+Â BChild Molestation 2 (9A.44.086)C+Â CFailure to Register as a Sex Offender (9A.44.132)DÂ Â Theft, Robbery, Extortion, and ForgeryÂ Â BTheft 1 (9A.56.030)CÂ CTheft 2 (9A.56.040)DÂ DTheft 3 (9A.56.050)EÂ BTheft of Livestock 1 and 2 (9A.56.080 and 9A.56.083)CÂ CForgery (9A.60.020)DÂ ARobbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 15 or underB+Â A++Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) committed atage 16 or 17AÂ B+Robbery 2 (9A.56.210)C+Â B+Extortion 1 (9A.56.120)C+Â C+Extortion 2 (9A.56.130)D+Â CIdentity Theft 1 (9.35.020(2))DÂ DIdentity Theft 2 (9.35.020(3))EÂ DImproperly Obtaining Financial Information (9.35.010)EÂ BPossession of a Stolen Vehicle (9A.56.068)CÂ BPossession of Stolen Property 1 (9A.56.150)CÂ CPossession of Stolen Property 2 (9A.56.160)DÂ DPossession of Stolen Property 3 (9A.56.170)EÂ BTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (9A.56.070)CÂ CTaking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (9A.56.075)DÂ BTheft of a Motor Vehicle (9A.56.065)CÂ Â Motor Vehicle Related CrimesÂ Â EDriving Without a License (46.20.005)EÂ B+Hit and Run - Death (46.52.020(4)(a))C+Â CHit and Run - Injury (46.52.020(4)(b))DÂ DHit and Run-Attended (46.52.020(5))EÂ EHit and Run-Unattended (46.52.010)EÂ CVehicular Assault (46.61.522)DÂ CAttempting to Elude Pursuing Police Vehicle (46.61.024)DÂ EReckless Driving (46.61.500)EÂ DDriving While Under the Influence (46.61.502 and 46.61.504)EÂ B+Felony Driving While Under the Influence (46.61.502(6))BÂ B+Felony Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (46.61.504(6))BÂ Â OtherÂ Â BAnimal Cruelty 1 (16.52.205)CÂ BBomb Threat (9.61.160)CÂ CEscape 11 (9A.76.110)CÂ CEscape 21 (9A.76.120)CÂ DEscape 3 (9A.76.130)EÂ EObscene, Harassing, Etc., Phone Calls (9.61.230)EÂ AOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class A FelonyB+Â BOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class B FelonyCÂ COther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Class C FelonyDÂ DOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult Gross MisdemeanorEÂ EOther Offense Equivalent to an Adult MisdemeanorEÂ VViolation of Order of Restitution, Community Supervision, or Confinement (13.40.200)2 V1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:1st escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 28 days confinement2nd escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement3rd and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks confinement2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDSThis schedule must be used for juvenile offenders. The court may select sentencing option A, B, C, or D.Â Â OPTION AJUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRIDSTANDARD RANGEÂ A++129 to 260 weeks for all category A++ offensesÂ A+180 weeks to age 21 for all category A+ offensesÂ A103-129 weeks for all category A offensesÂ A-30-40 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksÂ B++15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeks103-129 weeksCURRENTB+15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeks80-100 weeks103-129 weeksOFFENSEBLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeks52-65 weeksCATEGORYC+LSLSLS15-36 weeks15-36 weeksÂ CLSLSLSLS15-36 weeksÂ D+LSLSLSLSLSÂ DLSLSLSLSLSÂ ELSLSLSLSLSPRIOR01234 or moreADJUDICATIONSÂ Â Â NOTE: References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement. "LS" means "local sanctions" as defined in RCW 13.40.020.(1) The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.(2) The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded down.(3) The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row defined by the current offense category.(4) RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense.(5) A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.OROPTION BSUSPENDED DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE(1) If the offender is subject to a standard range disposition involving confinement by the department, the court may impose the standard range and suspend the disposition on condition that the offender comply with one or more local sanctions and any educational or treatment requirement. The treatment programs provided to the offender must be either research-based best practice programs as identified by the Washington state institute for public policy or the joint legislative audit and review committee, or for chemical dependency treatment programs or services, they must be evidence-based or research-based best practice programs. For the purposes of this subsection:(a) "Evidence-based" means a program or practice that has had multiple site random controlled trials across heterogeneous populations demonstrating that the program or practice is effective for the population; and(b) "Research-based" means a program or practice that has some research demonstrating effectiveness, but that does not yet meet the standard of evidence-based practices.(2) If the offender fails to comply with the suspended disposition, the court may impose sanctions pursuant to RCW 13.40.200 or may revoke the suspended disposition and order the disposition's execution.(3) An offender is ineligible for the suspended disposition option under this section if the offender:(a) Is adjudicated of an A+ or A++ offense;(b) Is fourteen years of age or older and is adjudicated of one or more of the following offenses:(i) A class A offense, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit a class A offense;(ii) Manslaughter in the first degree (RCW 9A.32.060);(iii) Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021), extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120), kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030), drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045), vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), hit and run death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a)), or manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070); or(iv) Violation of the uniform controlled substances act (RCW 69.50.401(2) (a) and (b)), when the offense includes infliction of bodily harm upon another or when during the commission or immediate withdrawal from the offense the respondent was armed with a deadly weapon;(c) Is ordered to serve a disposition for a firearm violation under RCW 13.40.193;(d) Is adjudicated of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or(e) Has a prior option B disposition.OROPTION CCHEMICAL DEPENDENCY/MENTAL HEALTH DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVEIf the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed a B++ or B+ offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(4) and 13.40.165.OROPTION DMANIFEST INJUSTICEIf the court determines that a disposition under option A, B, or C would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).--- END ---